New York, session 2025-2026, S7886.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 2 of the general business law is REPEALED. 2 § 2. Subdivision 7 of section 208 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering 3 and breeding law, as amended by chapter 243 of the laws of 2020, is 4 amended to read as follows: 5 7. Notwithstanding [the provisions of section seven of the general 6 business law, or] any [other] inconsistent provision of general, special 7 or local law, the commission shall specify annually the dates on which, 8 and the hour of the first post time for days during which, such fran- 9 chised corporation may operate at the places and for the full number of 10 days specified in its franchise. 11 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10863-01-5